Illinois, session 104th, HB894.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is 5amended by changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 5/1-1)  (was 20 ILCS 5/1)7    Sec. 1-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Civil Administrative Code of Illinois.9(Source: P.A. 91-239, eff. 1-1-00.)